Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-1601.01
Residency requirement.

A county treasurer elected after November 1986 need not be a resident of the county when he or she files for election as county treasurer, but a county treasurer shall reside in a county for which he or she holds office.

Laws 1986, LB 812, § 5;

Laws 1996, LB 1085, § 33.